Nebraska, session 109, LB1245.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1245 LB1245
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-1101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1101 The purposes of sections 81-1101 to 81-1117.05 and section 3
of this act and 81-1121 are to:
(1) Provide for the development and maintenance of a modern system
of budgetary, inventory, and financial accounting;
(2) Provide for development and maintenance of such modern and
economical methods and systems for record keeping, accounting,
expenditure planning and control as may be possible through timely
adoption of modern technological developments;
(3) Provide for centralized direction of services and service
agencies;
(4) Assure the development and operation of organizational and
procedural innovations as may be expected to provide acceptable internal
control of the handling and processing of public funds; and
(5) Focus responsibility for execution of the financial policies of
this state on the chief executive and provide assistants having the
necessary technical skills for the achievement of that end.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1102 For purposes of sections 81-1101 to 81-1117.05 and section 3
of this act and 81-1121, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Gender with reference to the masculine or feminine gender shall
be construed to apply to either or both genders;
(2) Executive budget means the budget proposed by the Governor to
the Legislature as the basis of appropriations for the operation of and
capital outlay by state government during the period covered by such
budget;
(3) Approved budget means the executive or Governor's budget as
modified by appropriations actions of the Legislature;
(4) Budgetary allotments means the plan of expenditures, by program,
-2-

LB1245 LB1245
2026 2026
subprogram, activity, or object of expenditure under the approved budget
for monthly or other applicable periods of time within each fiscal year,
to which a department or agency may be held during such period of time
within the fiscal year;
(5) Accrual system means the recording of revenue when earned and
the recording of expenditures as soon as they result in liabilities,
notwithstanding the fact that the receipt of the revenue or payment of
the expenditure may take place, in whole or in part, in another
accounting period;
(6) Double entry system means a system of bookkeeping which requires
for every entry made to the debit side of an account or accounts an entry
for a corresponding amount or amounts to the credit side of another
account or accounts resulting in a self-balancing accounting system;
(7) Disbursement means payment from the state treasury;
(8) Expenditure means, when an accrual system has been established,
total liability incurred by contract, purchase order, or payroll
commitments or as otherwise provided by law, whether or not related
disbursement has been made from the state treasury, and shall mean, until
an accrual system has been established, disbursements from the state
treasury;
(9) Revenue means, when an accrual system has been established,
additions to assets which do not increase any liability or represent the
recovery of an expenditure or disbursement or any part thereof or the
cancellation of liabilities without a corresponding increase in other
liabilities or a decrease in assets. Until an accrual system has been
established, this term means additions to cash in the state treasury or
for deposit in the state treasury only;
(10) Receipts means cash received, unless otherwise qualified;
(11) Encumbrances means charges to appropriation accounts to reflect
obligations for which a part of the appropriation is reserved and which
shall cease to be encumbrances when paid or when an actual liability is
-3-

LB1245 LB1245
2026 2026
established in a proprietary account;
(12) Financing agreement means any bond, lease-purchase obligation,
installment sales contract, or similar financial arrangement, for a
period greater than one year, which is entered into by the state or any
agency, board, or commission thereof, not including the University of
Nebraska or state colleges, in accordance with the Constitution of
Nebraska and statutes of this state, relating to capital construction,
real property acquisition, and personal property acquisition;
(13) Proprietary account means those accounts designed to show
actual financial position and operations such as actual assets,
liabilities, surplus, revenue, and expenditures, as distinguished from
budgetary accounts;
(14) Program means a major operation of the state government
directed toward the achievement of a definite legal objective and which,
in most instances, could be carried on independently of other major
operations of the state as defined and described in the accounting and
budgeting manuals on file in the office of the Director of Administrative
Services;
(15) Subprogram means one or more operations of a department or
agency of the state designed jointly to accomplish a major program
objective as defined in the accounting and budgeting manuals on file in
the office of the Director of Administrative Services;
(16) Activity means one or more operations of a department or agency
of the state designed jointly to accomplish the objective of a subprogram
to which it is related as defined in the accounting and budgeting manual
on file in the office of the Director of Administrative Services;
(17) Budget request means the complete recitation, on forms
prescribed by the budget division and in the manner prescribed by such
division, of the operating and construction funds requests of a
department or agency for the biennium next following the then current
biennium;
-4-

LB1245 LB1245
2026 2026
(18) Department means the Department of Administrative Services; and
(19) Director means the Director of Administrative Services.
Sec. 3. Beginning July 1, 2026, the department shall assign each
member of the Legislature, judge of the Supreme Court, and judge of the
Court of Appeals a parking spot at the 1331 K Street parking garage. The
department may work with the Nebraska State Patrol to adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the security of the
garage.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-1101 and 81-1102, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-